District of Columbia statutes.
26-1106

Rejection of license application.

(a)

(1)

If an applicant does not meet the requirements of § 26-1103, the Superintendent [Commissioner] shall:

(A)

Immediately notify the applicant in writing of this fact;

(B)

Return the bond filed under § 26-1103; and

(C)

Refund the license fee.

(2)

The Superintendent [Commissioner] shall, subject to the appropriations process, keep the investigation fee and application fee.

(b)

Within 30 days after the Superintendent [Commissioner] denies an application, the Superintendent [Commissioner] shall:

(1)

Issue a written decision containing the reasons upon which the denial was based;

(2)

Send a copy of the decision to the applicant; and

(3)

Advise the applicant of a right to a hearing which shall be held in accordance with subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

(c)

(1)

An applicant who seeks a hearing on a license application denial shall file a written request for a hearing within 45 days following receipt of the written decision for denial.

(2)

A hearing date established in response to the filing of a notice under this subsection may be postponed only once for a period of up to 30 days after the initial hearing date.

History

Sept. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-155, § 7, 43 DCR 4213

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 26-1006.